Vermont, session 2025-2026, H121.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 9 V.S.A. § 2466d is added to read:
§ 2466d. AFFORDABLE BROADBAND SERVICE
(a) On or before October 1, 2025, an internet service provider engaged in
the provision of broadband service shall offer and provide affordable
broadband service to eligible low-income consumers.
(b) As used in this section:
(1) “Affordable broadband service” means:
(A) Broadband service capable of a download speed of at least 25
Mbps at a monthly price of not more than $15.00, inclusive of any recurring
VT LEG #380080 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.121
2025 Page 2 of 7
taxes and fees such as recurring rental fees for provider equipment required to
obtain broadband service and usage fees.
(B) Broadband service capable of a download speed of at least 200
Mbps at a monthly price of not more than $20.00, inclusive of any recurring
taxes and fees such as recurring rental fees for provider equipment required to
obtain broadband service and usage fees.
(2) “Broadband service” means a mass-market retail service by wire or
radio in Vermont that provides the capability to transmit data to and receive
data from all or substantially all internet endpoints, including any capabilities
that are incidental to and enable the operation of the communications service
provided by a wireline or fixed wireless service provider, but shall not include
dial-up internet access service.
(3) “Internet service provider” or “provider” means a business that
provides broadband service to any person in Vermont.
(4) “Low-income consumer” means a household that qualifies for
participation in:
(A) the federal Lifeline program under criteria established by the
Federal Communications Commission or other federal law or regulation; or
(B) the Home Heating Fuel Assistance Program established under
Title 33, chapter 26.
VT LEG #380080 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.121
2025 Page 3 of 7
(c) The Public Utility Commission shall adopt by rule the following
provisions:
(1) The time and manner in which the prices established in subdivisions
(b)(1)(A) and (B) of this section may be adjusted to account for inflationary
changes as measured by the Consumer Price Index, but in no event may the
monthly price be increased by more than two percent per year.
(2) Standards and procedures for waiving, upon a provider’s request, the
minimum speed requirement specified in subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section
but only if the Commission determines such download speed is not reasonably
practicable under the circumstances and specifies an alternative minimum
download speed.
(3) Standards and procedures for exempting an internet service provider
from the requirements of this section if:
(A) the provider provides broadband service to not more than 20,000
customers; and
(B) the Commission determines compliance with the requirements of
this section would have an unreasonable or unsustainable financial impact on
the provider.
(4) A process for ensuring that any contract or agreement for affordable
broadband service entered into pursuant to this section has the same terms and
VT LEG #380080 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.121
2025 Page 4 of 7
conditions, other than price and speed, as the regularly priced offerings for
similar broadband service provided by the provider.
(d) Beginning on November 15, 2025, and annually thereafter, an internet
service provider shall submit to the Department of Public Service a compliance
report, which shall include the following information:
(1) a description of the affordable broadband service offered pursuant to
this section;
(2) the number of customers receiving affordable broadband service;
(3) a description of the procedures used to verify customer eligibility for
affordable broadband service;
(4) a description and samples of the advertising or marketing efforts
undertaken to advertise or promote affordable broadband service;
(5) a description of all retail rate products, including pricing, offered by
the provider;
(6) a description, including speed and price, of all broadband products
offered in Vermont;
(7) the number of customers in arrears for broadband service, the
percentage of customers in arrears that qualify for affordable broadband
service, the number of customers that have had their service terminated for
nonpayment, the number of customers whose service was terminated for
arrears arising from nonpayment for services other than broadband service, and
VT LEG #380080 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.121
2025 Page 5 of 7
the number of customers that have had their broadband service restored after
being delinquent on their payments; and
(8) any other information the Commissioner deems necessary and
relevant to carrying out the purpose of this section.
(e) Beginning on or before October 1, 2027, and not less than every five
years thereafter, the Commissioner of Public Service shall undertake a
proceeding to:
(1) determine if the minimum download speed requirement established
under subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section should be increased to correspond
with the Federal Communications Commission’s benchmark for high-speed
fixed broadband, or to another minimum download speed deemed appropriate
by the Commissioner; and
(2) review the consumer eligibility requirements established under
subdivision (b)(4) of this section and determine whether those requirements
should be updated to meet the needs of consumers.
(f) Beginning on or before December 15, 2026, and annually thereafter and
notwithstanding the limitation in 2 V.S.A. § 20(d), the Commissioner of Public
Service shall submit to the General Assembly a report that includes:
(1) a narrative description of the aggregated data obtained from the
annual compliance reports submitted pursuant to subsection (d) of this section;
VT LEG #380080 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.121
2025 Page 6 of 7
(2) any recommended increase to the minimum download speed
established in subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section;
(3) any recommended update to the consumer eligibility requirements
established in subdivision (b)(4) of this section; and
(4) any other findings and recommendations the Commissioner deems
necessary and appropriate to the implementation of this section.
(g) An internet service provider shall make all commercially reasonable
efforts to promote and advertise the availability of affordable broadband
service, including the prominent display of, and enrollment procedures for,
such service on the provider’s website and in any written and commercial
promotional materials developed to inform consumers who may be eligible for
affordable broadband service pursuant to this section. In addition, the
Department of Public Service shall undertake appropriate measures to inform
the public about available broadband products, including retail rate products
and affordable broadband service offerings.
(h) An internet service provider who violates a provision of this section
commits an unfair and deceptive act in commerce in violation of section 2453
of this title.
(i) An internet service provider who willfully and knowingly violates a
provision of this section shall be liable for a civil penalty of up to $1,000.00
per violation.
VT LEG #380080 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.121
2025 Page 7 of 7
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #380080 v.1